Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-103 Family coverage defined.
As used in this part, family coverage means a policy that insures, originally
or upon subsequent amendment, an adult member of a family who shall be deemed
the policyholder and any two or more eligible members of that family, including
spouse, dependent children or any children under a specified age which shall
not exceed nineteen years, and any other person dependent upon the
policyholder. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 205, §21]

Attorney General Opinions

Section 431:10A-601 applied to all parts of article 10A if
the category of policy under consideration included family coverage, as defined
in this section. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next